Vermont, session 2025-2026, H531.
It is hereby enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Vermont:
Sec. 1. 3 V.S.A. § 310 is amended to read:
§ 310. CLASSIFICATION PLAN; RULES
* * *
(f) The Classification and Compensation Plan and the rules for personnel
administration shall be based on merit system principles and shall provide for
compliance with the laws relating to preference granted to qualified persons
who have served in the U.S. Armed Forces and received honorable discharge.
VT LEG #384735 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.531
2026 Page 2 of 3
(g)(1) After the requirements of an applicable collective bargaining
agreement have been satisfied with regard to hiring issues and after compliance
with subsection 327(a) of this title, and consistent with applicable State or
federal standards for affirmative action, the State shall make a diligent effort to
recruit, interview, and hire:
(A) those applicants who meet the definition of a veteran as defined
by 38 U.S.C. § 101 and who received an honorable discharge; and
(B) the spouses of veterans, as defined in subdivision (A) of this
subdivision (1), who currently receive disability compensation or improved
pension from the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs and are unable to work
due to disability and the surviving spouses of veterans in cases where the
surviving spouse currently receives dependency indemnity compensation from
the U.S. Department of Veterans Affairs; and
(C) the spouses of personnel currently serving in the U.S. Armed
Forces.
(2) Veterans and spouses of personnel currently serving in the U.S.
Armed Forces who apply for and meet the requirements for any open
competitive recruitment that is conducted using a point-based examination and
who receive a passing score shall have five points added to their competitive
examination rating, and service-connected disabled veterans, veterans’
unremarried widows or widowers, and spouses of totally service-connected
VT LEG #384735 v.1

BILL AS INTRODUCED H.531
2026 Page 3 of 3
disabled veterans who meet the requirements for any open competitive
examination and who receive a passing score shall have ten 10 points added to
their competitive examination rating, subject to the provisions contained in 20
V.S.A. § 1543.
(h) Those individuals qualifying under subdivision (g)(1)(A) of this section
shall be entitled to apply and compete for vacant positions for which
recruitment is being conducted only on a statewide promotional basis.
* * *
Sec. 2. EFFECTIVE DATE
This act shall take effect on July 1, 2026.
VT LEG #384735 v.1